Hawaii statutes.
§179-1 Declaration of purpose. It is
declared:

(1) That floods caused by heavy rainstorms and
abnormal tidal action are detrimental to the health, safety, and general
welfare of the people of the State, resulting in jeopardy to and the loss of
life and property, disruption of commerce, and interruption of transportation
and communications; that the reduction of flood damage is therefore of primary
importance to the people of the State; and the conservation and beneficial use
of flood water is an essential adjunct to rainfall drainage and flood control.

(2) It is the purpose of this chapter to provide for
the coordination by the State of all federal and state flood control projects
undertaken in Hawaii and for such technical or financial assistance to its
political subdivisions as may be desirable or necessary to assure maximum
benefits to the people of the State from the expenditure of state funds for
flood control purposes.

(3) Nothing in this chapter shall prevent any
political subdivision through its proper officials from requesting federal aid
on its own initiative and at its own expense without having to secure state
approval. [L 1961, c 34, §1; am L 1963, c 148, pt of §1; Supp, §87C-1; HRS
§179-1]

Cross References

Participation in federal flood insurance program, see chapter
126. For county provisions, see §46-11.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next